src-fst-morphology-affixes-irregularverbs.lexc.md
Irregular verbs

These are the "irregular" verbs, which are mostly prefixing or copular.

The copulas are mostly suffixing, and all the other verbs include person
prefixes, and agreement on suffixes for person. Tense and mood are
expressed with complex stem alternations that are no longer 100% productive,
and progressive is formed from a derivational stem, with no person prefixes.

NB: After adding in some additional morphological boundaries for some of the
verbs, it should become obvious that some more simplification in amount
of lexica is possible. Prefixing verbs often have multiple stems for
separate tenses, and more or less get the same person prefixes in
full and reduced paradigms. The only trick there is it requires more
flag diacritics, to make sure that the prefix matches the suffix.

TODO: omg

LEXICON MA  _ma_ and related inflected forms.

Ah

_ah_ is a verb meaning 'to exist', but can function as a copula. It is
inflected in all tenses, but has long and short forms.

LEXICON Ah  Inflections in tense.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/irregularverbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-som/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/irregularverbs.lexc)</small>

---
